North Carolina, session 2025, HB355.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Study. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall conduct a
comprehensive review of firefighting in rural areas of the State. The purpose of the study is to
examine current trends, problems, and opportunities confronting rural fire departments and
suggest funding and other legislative actions needed to keep those fire departments fiscally sound
and mission effective.
SECTION 1.(b) Scope. – The study conducted by the Office of the State Fire
Marshal under this section shall examine and evaluate, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Volunteer firefighter recruitment and retention. Identify programs, actions, or
incentives that could increase recruitment and retention, including (i) financial
incentives or benefits; or (ii) modern, comprehensive training programs to
ensure volunteers are properly certified and equipped to perform their duties.
(2) Funding and resource allocation, including (i) an analysis of the current
distribution of funding and how it could be improved to ensure that rural fire
departments have the resources they need to continue to meet their mission,
(ii) opportunities for federal and State grants specifically for rural firefighting
needs, and (iii) strategies for purchasing and maintaining costly equipment
such as fire trucks, hoses, and protective gear.
(3) Interagency cooperation and mutual aid agreements, including how such
agreements can be strengthened, how to improve collaboration among rural
departments and between rural and urban departments to allow for more
effective response during large-scale emergencies, and best practices for
sharing resources and training among fire departments, law enforcement, and
emergency medical services in rural areas.
(4) The physical, mental, and emotional toll that rural firefighting takes on
firefighters, including identification of programs to help maintain firefighter
health and well-being.
(5) Public education and outreach, including (i) fire safety programs to ensure that
residents in rural North Carolina are educated about fire safety, such as
creating defensible space around their properties and understanding how to
evacuate in case of fire, and (ii) programs to engage and encourage youth
involvement in firefighting, building interest in the profession among young
people.
*H355-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Long-term sustainability and community engagement, including reducing the
environmental impact of fire response activities and encouraging
community-driven approaches to firefighting, such as neighborhood fire
prevention efforts or local fire departments hosting regular community
engagement events.
SECTION 1.(c) Stakeholder Engagement. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal
shall engage stakeholders, including fire chiefs and firefighters from rural departments,
representatives of statewide organizations for firefighters and fire departments, and rural
community leaders. The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall conduct at least three public
hearings, one in each geographic region of the State (Western, Central, and Eastern North
Carolina), to gather public input and recommendations. The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall
open a public comment period of at least 90 days during which individuals, fire departments, and
organizations may submit feedback.
SECTION 1.(d) Report and Legislative Recommendations. – The Office of the State
Fire Marshal shall submit a report on the results of the study authorized by this section, including
any recommended legislation, to the General Assembly by March 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 355-Second Edition